src/fst/morphology/stems/english.lexc
!! E. Uí Dhonnchadha
!! JULY 2013
!! ENGLISH LEX & COMMUNICATORS (CHILDES term)
!! AUG 2025 added +OLang/ENG for Giellalt integration

!LEXICON Root
!	Englishlex;
!	Communicators-English;


LEXICON Communicators-English  !!≈ **@CODE@**
< f a i r  %_:%  p l a y %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;
< s o r t  %_:%  o f %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;
< n o %_:%  w a y %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;
< k n o w %_:%  w h a t %_:%  I %_:%  m e a n %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >	#;
< I %_:%  m e a n %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;
< I %_:%  s u p p o s e %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;
< [Y|y] o u %_:%  k n o w %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;
< d ' y a %_:%  k n o w %+OLang%/ENG:0 %+Cmc:0 %+English:0 >		#;

anyway+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:anyway			#;
anyway+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:anyways			#;
alright+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:alright			#;
aye+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:aye				#;
but+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:but				#;
!!!cos+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:cos			#; ! cos=because (English) too like cos=foot (Irish) - could add @dm
bydad+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:bydad				#;
lovely+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:lovely			#;
lookat+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:lookat			#;
like+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:like				#;
just+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:just				#;
just+Cmc+English:jus				#;
no+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:no				#;
now+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:now				#;
ok+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:ok				#;
or+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:or				#;
okay+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:okay				#;
since+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:since			#;
sure+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:sure				#;
so+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:so@eng				#;
so+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:so@dm				#;	!! @dm discourse marker added to distinguish this from Irish so=seo=here
really+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:really				#;
yeah+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:yeah				#;
well+OLang/ENG+Cmc+English:well				#;

LEXICON English-noun-place-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Noun+Prop+Def:	#;

LEXICON English-noun-prop-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Noun+Prop:	#;

LEXICON English-noun-com-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Noun:	#;

LEXICON English-verb-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Verb:	#;

LEXICON English-adj-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Adj:	#;

LEXICON English-prep-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Prep:	#;

LEXICON English-det-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Det:	#;

LEXICON English-adv-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Adv:	#;

LEXICON English-conj-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Conj:	#;

LEXICON English-pron-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Pron:	#;

LEXICON English-num-tag
+OLang/ENG+Foreign+English+Num:	#;

LEXICON Englishlex
across	English-prep-tag;
against	English-prep-tag;
ajar	English-adj-tag;
almond	English-noun-com-tag;
along	English-prep-tag;
Amazon	English-noun-place-tag;
ambivalently	English-adv-tag;
amidst	English-prep-tag;
amongst	English-prep-tag;
And	English-conj-tag;
and	English-conj-tag;
Andalusia	English-noun-prop-tag;
Andes	English-noun-place-tag;
another	English-det-tag;
any	English-det-tag;
any	English-pron-tag;
anyone	English-pron-tag;
Apennines	English-noun-place-tag;
apes	English-verb-tag;
aquatic	English-adj-tag;
Argentine	English-noun-place-tag;
around	English-prep-tag;
aspects	English-noun-com-tag;
Asturias	English-noun-prop-tag;
at	English-prep-tag;
audaciously	English-adv-tag;
Azores	English-noun-place-tag;
bald	English-adj-tag;
Balkans	English-noun-place-tag;
barring	English-prep-tag;
Basque	English-noun-prop-tag;
bastion	English-noun-com-tag;
baulked	English-verb-tag;
before	English-conj-tag;
behind	English-prep-tag;
beneath	English-prep-tag;
besides	English-prep-tag;
beyond	English-prep-tag;
Bible	English-noun-place-tag;
blind	English-adj-tag;
bloody-mindedly	English-adv-tag;
bold	English-noun-com-tag;
Bordeaux	English-noun-prop-tag;
both	English-det-tag;
both	English-pron-tag;
branching	English-verb-tag;
Bronx	English-noun-place-tag;
burlesque	English-noun-com-tag;
Burma	English-noun-prop-tag;
Cairngorms	English-noun-place-tag;
Capitol	English-noun-place-tag;
Catalonia	English-noun-prop-tag;
Caucasus	English-noun-place-tag;
cavities	English-noun-com-tag;
centrifuging	English-verb-tag;
certain	English-det-tag;
cheapest	English-adj-tag;
Chilterns	English-noun-place-tag;
choppily	English-adv-tag;
clays	English-noun-com-tag;
Cologne	English-noun-prop-tag;
complement	English-verb-tag;
conductors	English-noun-com-tag;
contagiously	English-adv-tag;
corniest	English-adj-tag;
counter	English-prep-tag;
couples	English-verb-tag;
coupon	English-noun-com-tag;
Crimea	English-noun-place-tag;
Dakar	English-noun-prop-tag;
darts	English-noun-com-tag;
Deccan	English-noun-place-tag;
deciduously	English-adv-tag;
defected	English-verb-tag;
deprived	English-adj-tag;
dinghies	English-noun-com-tag;
disciplined	English-verb-tag;
dissimilarly	English-adv-tag;
Dolomites	English-noun-place-tag;
Dumfries	English-noun-prop-tag;
duplicates	English-verb-tag;
duster	English-noun-com-tag;
each	English-det-tag;
easy	English-adj-tag;
eight	English-num-tag;
eighteenth	English-num-tag;
eightieth	English-num-tag;
either	English-conj-tag;
either	English-det-tag;
either	English-pron-tag;
eleven	English-num-tag;
enervatingly	English-adv-tag;
errs	English-verb-tag;
European	English-noun-com-tag;
every	English-det-tag;
everyone	English-pron-tag;
except	English-prep-tag;
Faeroe	English-noun-place-tag;
fast	English-adv-tag;
fattiest	English-adj-tag;
few	English-det-tag;
few	English-pron-tag;
Fiat	English-noun-prop-tag;
fifteen	English-num-tag;
fiftieth	English-num-tag;
figure	English-noun-com-tag;
filming	English-verb-tag;
first	English-num-tag;
for	English-conj-tag;
fortieth	English-num-tag;
four	English-num-tag;
fourteenth	English-num-tag;
from	English-prep-tag;
frugally	English-adv-tag;
fuzziest	English-adj-tag;
gabble	English-verb-tag;
Golan	English-noun-prop-tag;
gossamer	English-noun-com-tag;
Grenadines	English-noun-place-tag;
harbour	English-verb-tag;
harmfully	English-adv-tag;
Harvard	English-noun-prop-tag;
heady	English-adj-tag;
her	English-det-tag;
her	English-pron-tag;
herself	English-pron-tag;
Highlands	English-noun-place-tag;
himself	English-pron-tag;
his	English-det-tag;
however	English-conj-tag;
humanity	English-noun-com-tag;
hundred	English-num-tag;
Hyderabad	English-noun-prop-tag;
if	English-conj-tag;
illustriously	English-adv-tag;
imprisons	English-verb-tag;
inane	English-adj-tag;
indoors	English-adv-tag;
intolerably	English-adv-tag;
invertebrate	English-adj-tag;
irrespective	English-prep-tag;
it	English-pron-tag;
its	English-det-tag;
Jakarta	English-noun-prop-tag;
jazzed	English-verb-tag;
Jungfrau	English-noun-place-tag;
Karlsruhe	English-noun-prop-tag;
ketchup	English-noun-com-tag;
Lancaster	English-noun-prop-tag;
Lebanon	English-noun-place-tag;
legibly	English-adv-tag;
less	English-det-tag;
less	English-pron-tag;
lest	English-conj-tag;
lithe	English-adj-tag;
little	English-det-tag;
lolling	English-verb-tag;
Londonderry	English-noun-prop-tag;
Manipur	English-noun-prop-tag;
manservants	English-noun-com-tag;
many	English-det-tag;
Matterhorn	English-noun-place-tag;
mealy-mouthedly	English-adv-tag;
meanwhile	English-conj-tag;
mercenary	English-adj-tag;
Miami	English-noun-prop-tag;
million	English-num-tag;
mine	English-pron-tag;
misinforming	English-verb-tag;
most	English-det-tag;
much	English-det-tag;
Muscat	English-noun-prop-tag;
mutely	English-adv-tag;
my	English-det-tag;
myself	English-pron-tag;
namesake	English-noun-com-tag;
neither	English-conj-tag;
neither	English-det-tag;
net	English-adj-tag;
Nile	English-noun-prop-tag;
nine	English-num-tag;
nineteenth	English-num-tag;
ninety	English-num-tag;
nobody	English-pron-tag;
no-one	English-pron-tag;
nor	English-conj-tag;
notwithstanding	English-prep-tag;
obtains	English-verb-tag;
oddly	English-adv-tag;
Olympics	English-noun-place-tag;
once	English-conj-tag;
one	English-num-tag;
one	English-pron-tag;
onto	English-prep-tag;
other	English-det-tag;
others	English-pron-tag;
otherwise	English-conj-tag;
our	English-det-tag;
ourselves	English-pron-tag;
outside	English-prep-tag;
Oxford	English-noun-prop-tag;
paediatric	English-adj-tag;
parties	English-noun-com-tag;
patting	English-verb-tag;
pecuniarily	English-adv-tag;
pending	English-prep-tag;
Pleiades	English-noun-place-tag;
Poland	English-noun-prop-tag;
portlier	English-adj-tag;
postdate	English-verb-tag;
practically	English-adv-tag;
prawn	English-noun-com-tag;
provided	English-conj-tag;
providing	English-conj-tag;
quadruple	English-verb-tag;
questioningly	English-adv-tag;
rambling	English-adj-tag;
re	English-prep-tag;
recesses	English-noun-com-tag;
redevelop	English-verb-tag;
researching	English-verb-tag;
reticently	English-adv-tag;
Reykjavik	English-noun-prop-tag;
roving	English-adj-tag;
Ruhr	English-noun-place-tag;
sabotages	English-verb-tag;
sanitariums	English-noun-com-tag;
seeing	English-conj-tag;
self-defeatingly	English-adv-tag;
seven	English-num-tag;
seventeenth	English-num-tag;
seventieth	English-num-tag;
shabbier	English-adj-tag;
she	English-pron-tag;
since	English-conj-tag;
Singapore	English-noun-prop-tag;
six	English-num-tag;
sixteenth	English-num-tag;
sixtieth	English-num-tag;
slog	English-noun-com-tag;
snorted	English-verb-tag;
soapily	English-adv-tag;
sober	English-adj-tag;
some	English-det-tag;
somebody	English-pron-tag;
something	English-pron-tag;
stodgily	English-adv-tag;
straggly	English-adj-tag;
subpoenas	English-noun-com-tag;
such	English-det-tag;
supposing	English-conj-tag;
swamped	English-verb-tag;
tattily	English-adv-tag;
tax-exempt	English-adj-tag;
Tees	English-noun-place-tag;
ten	English-num-tag;
than	English-conj-tag;
thanks	English-prep-tag;
Thanksgiving	English-noun-prop-tag;
their	English-det-tag;
theirs	English-pron-tag;
themselves	English-pron-tag;
they	English-pron-tag;
third	English-num-tag;
thirty	English-num-tag;
this	English-det-tag;
though	English-conj-tag;
till	English-conj-tag;
till	English-prep-tag;
tornado	English-noun-com-tag;
towards	English-prep-tag;
trillion	English-num-tag;
Turks	English-noun-place-tag;
twentieth	English-num-tag;
two-way	English-adj-tag;
ungratefully	English-adv-tag;
unless	English-conj-tag;
unquestionable	English-adj-tag;
unrolls	English-verb-tag;
until	English-prep-tag;
uppermost	English-prep-tag;
Vienna	English-noun-prop-tag;
vis--vis	English-prep-tag;
void	English-noun-com-tag;
we	English-pron-tag;
Wear	English-noun-place-tag;
welcoming	English-adj-tag;
what	English-det-tag;
when	English-conj-tag;
where	English-conj-tag;
whereby	English-conj-tag;
whether	English-conj-tag;
which	English-det-tag;
whichever	English-pron-tag;
whose	English-det-tag;
whose	English-pron-tag;
yet	English-conj-tag;
